Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB5.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Agricultural product" has the same meaning as in KRS 260.016; and
(b) "Kentucky-grown agricultural product" has the same meaning as in KRS 260.016.
(2) A local school board or local school district participating in any of the United States Department of
Agriculture Child Nutrition Programs may purchase Kentucky-grown agricultural products in accordance
with federal law and shall not be subject to KRS 45A.345 to 45A.460 or 424.260.
(3) This section shall not be construed to exempt a local school board or local school district from any other
requirement established by state or federal law.
Section 2. Whereas it is imperative that children throughout the Commonwealth are served nutritious and
healthy foods at home and in school districts, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its
passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Signed by Governor March 27, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version